Catalan.dic
Abat/WY
abdomen/VY
abella/EVY
Abellà/WY
ablatiu/BEVY
abonament/EVY
Abraham/WY
abrigall/EVY
abrusador/FVY
Absaló/WY
absté/Z
abstenim/Z
abstindrem/Z
abstingué/Z
abstingues/Z
abstinguessis/Z
abstractesa/EVY
abstrauen/Z
abstreguis/Z
acabament/EVY
acanís/Z
acantonada/VY
acatalèctica/VY
accionalista/EVY
acètica/VY
acidofília/EVY
Aciscle/WY
aclaparament/EVY
acollonada/VY
aconsellador/FVY
acorreguérem/Z
acorreguésseu/Z
acorren/Z
acorreríem/Z
acorríem/Z
acostumat/BVY
acroamàtica/VY
actina/EVY
acuit/EVY
acull/Z
acutorsió/GVY
Adalsinda/WY
adèieu/Z
Adelf/WY
adenílic/EVY
Adern/WY
adherida/VY
adiguem/Z
adigués/Z
adiguéssiu/Z
adiràs/Z
adiríeu/Z
administrativa/VY
adobable/EVY
adormís/Z
adrenocorticotròpica/EVY
Adroer/WY
adscrivires/Z
adscrivissin/Z
Adserà/WY
adveníem/Z
advindrà/Z
advindrien/Z
advinguérem/Z
advinguesses/Z
advinguí/Z
aerodinàmica/VY
aerofar/EVY
afanyada/VY
afàquia/EVY
afil·loforat/EVY
afinació/GVY
afroasiàtica/VY
afrocubà/HVY
Afrodisi/WY
afús/Z
Agató/WY
Agatocles/WY
agenciada/VY
Agil/WY
Agolada/WY
Agomar/WY
agossat/BVY
agresolat/BVY
Agrícola/WY
agroalimentària/VY
Aguilella/WY
agullera/EVY
Agustí/WY
Aicard/WY
aiguabat/SZ
aiguabatuda/VY
aiguavessant/EVY
Aigulf/WY
aixadol/EVY
Aixandri/WY
aixovar/EVY
ajegues/Z
Alabern/WY
aladern/EVY
Alairac/WY
alaman/FVY
alambín/Z
Alapont/WY
Alàs/VWY
Albagès/WY
Albana/WY
albardera/EVY
Albàs/WY
albatros/EVY
Alberdí/WY
Albern/WY
Albesa/VWY
Albina/WY
Albiol/VWY
Albony/WY
Alborx/WY
alcaica/VY
Alcarràs/VWY
alcavotejada/VY
alcudià/HVY
Alda/WY
Aldetruda/WY
Aldrover/WY
alefat/EVY
Alegrí/WY
Alemany/WY
Alesan/WY
alfac/EVY
alfarda/EVY
Alfeu/WY
Algar/VWY
algidesa/EVY
algina/EVY
Aliana/WY
alineament/EVY
alipteri/EVY
Alisandra/WY
alleugeriment/EVY
alliberadora/VY
al·losteria/EVY
al·lotriomorf/FVY
Almar/WY
Almirall/WY
almoín/Z
almoineria/EVY
aloer/FVY
Alonso/WY
Alquer/WY
alta/EVY
Altabert/WY
Alta-riba/WY
altimètric/FVY
Altisent/WY
aluminiada/VY
Alzet/WY
Amalberta/WY
amanida/EVY
Amanós/WY
amarament/EVY
amàs/VYZ
ambientòloga/EVY
Amblàs/WY
ambo/EVY
Ametler/WY
amfetaminomania/EVY
amfibòlic/FVY
Amill/WY
aminoacidopatia/EVY
aminobenzoic/EVY
Amorat/WY
amorosívol/FVY
amorronida/VY
anabaptisme/EVY
anacard/EVY
analògica/VY
anap/EVY
anaren/Z
Anastasi/WY
anau/Z
ancó/GVY
andamanès/JVY
Andamí/WY
Andreví/WY
anecdòtic/FVY
anemografia/EVY
anéssem/Z
aneu/Z
Angelats/WY
angiòloga/EVY
Anglesill/WY
angoixada/VY
Anguita/WY
Anià/WY
anisogàmia/EVY
anoètica/VY
Anoll/WY
anquilòtic/FVY
antecessora/VY
antiarna/VY
Antic/WY
anticàtode/EVY
antiepilèptic/FVY
antifonera/VY
antijurídic/FVY
antimilitarisme/EVY
Antíoc/WY
antipoètica/VY
antiretorn/EVY
antofil·le/EVY
antràcic/FVY
Antunyà/WY
any/EVY
anyocada/VY
apallís/Z
Aparici/WY
àpat/EVY
apedaçament/EVY
apercep/Z
apirrossada/VY
aplacentat/BVY
apologètica/VY
apomada/VY
aprenenta/VY
aprenentatge/EVY
Apronià/WY
aquea/EVY
aqueferat/BVY
aquís/Z
Araceli/WY
Aramon/WY
Aranyuel/VY
arbitrària/VY
Arbocet/WY
Arc/WY
Arceda/WY
Ardebal/WY
Ardit/WY
arecàcia/EVY
aresblanc/FVY
Argelagó/WY
Argentó/WY
argentós/JVY
argumentador/FVY
Ariadna/WY
Arisa/WY
Aritja/WY
arlot/EVY
Armandell/WY
armella/EVY
Armentera/VWY
Arnau/WY
Arnilles/WY
Aromir/WY
arponat/BVY
arquebisbat/EVY
arrasat/BVY
arrauxat/BVY
Arrei/WY
arremolín/Z
arrimada/EVY
arroentament/EVY
Arsac/WY
artaire/EVY
Artells/WY
arteriovenós/JVY
Artigosa/WY
Artorc/WY
artroplàstia/EVY
arxiver/FVY
Asclepíades/WY
ascòrbic/EVY
asíncron/FVY
asperulosa/VY
Aspriu/WY
assalariat/BVY
assembleària/VY
asseu/SZ
assimilatori/KVY
assortit/BVY
Astol/WY
astorador/FVY
astrovirus/EVY
atarumbament/EVY
atencional/EVY
ateníem/Z
Atenodor/WY
aterròs/Z
atindria/Z
atinguen/Z
atinguéssem/Z
atingueu/Z
atlantista/EVY
atoniment/EVY
atraus/Z
atreim/Z
atrocitat/EVY
atrotinada/VY
Aubiac/WY
Auferil/WY
aufrany/EVY
auguració/GVY
Aulí/WY
Aurelià/WY
Ausà/WY
autarquia/EVY
autístic/FVY
autoencesa/EVY
autoexclosa/VY
autopàtic/FVY
autòptica/VY
Auxiliadora/WY
avajonera/EVY
avancívol/FVY
aven/Z
Avencar/WY
avenim/Z
averroista/EVY
avidolada/VY
avindràs/Z
avindríeu/Z
avingueres/Z
avinguéssim/Z
avinguis/Z
axiòmetre/EVY
Azcona/WY
azoospèrmia/EVY
comet/Z
convenç/Z
eclogal/EVY
ectocarpal/EVY
edifici/EVY
Edita/WY
efeb/EVY
Efrén/WY
egarenca/VY
eivissenc/FVY
eixarreïment/EVY
Eixea/WY
eixí/Z
eixirà/Z
eixireu/Z
eixiu/Z
eixobrirà/Z
eixobrís/Z
ejectiu/BVY
eleata/EVY
electrofisiològica/VY
electromèric/FVY
elegíac/FVY
Eligi/WY
eligulat/BVY
Eloïsa/WY
emarginat/BVY
embafament/EVY
embardís/Z
embellit/BVY
emblanquidor/FVY
embotzegada/VY
embretxita/EVY
emètica/VY
emfisematós/JVY
Emília/VWY
emmèn/Z
emmoquetada/VY
emmoriscada/VY
empastada/VY
empastrament/EVY
empitjorament/EVY
empixonada/VY
empolaín/Z
èmula/VY
encaminada/VY
encaminadora/VY
encativament/EVY
encén/SZ
encisador/FVY
encistada/VY
encobrí/Z
encobrireu/Z
encobríssim/Z
encorfada/VY
encorregueren/Z
encorrerà/Z
encorrien/Z
endevinatòria/VY
endobasidi/EVY
endoteliocorial/EVY
enduen/Z
enduguésseu/Z
enduis/Z
enfarín/Z
enfavament/EVY
enfervoriment/EVY
Enfruns/WY
enfugin/Z
enfugiríeu/Z
engaldidora/VY
engàs/Z
engelosida/VY
engolidor/FVY
enjovada/VY
enllotament/EVY
enòfoba/VY
enriostament/EVY
enrós/Z
ensegonada/EVY
ensomniada/VY
Entença/WY
entera/VY
entomogàmia/EVY
entravessat/BVY
entrebat/SZ
entrediguérem/Z
entrediguí/Z
entredius/Z
entreobren/Z
entreobrirem/Z
entreobrísseu/Z
entrespolada/VY
entreteníem/Z
entretindrien/Z
entretinguesses/Z
entrevegi/Z
entreveiessen/Z
entrevenia/Z
entreveuran/Z
entrevindrem/Z
entrevingues/Z
entrevista/EVY
entropés/Z
envellidora/VY
enzoòtic/FVY
ependimària/VY
epílit/EVY
equiangle/EVY
equimúltipla/VY
Erasme/WY
ergotina/EVY
Ermità/WY
eruptiu/BVY
esbadellada/VY
esbardís/Z
esbotifarrament/EVY
Escacs/WY
escairadora/VY
escalabilitat/EVY
escandinava/VY
escanyús/Z
escardot/EVY
escarlata/EVY
Escarp/WY
escellada/VY
esclerosada/VY
esclova/EVY
Escofet/WY
escorball/EVY
escorreguem/Z
escorreguí/Z
escorri/Z
escotoma/EVY
Escrig/WY
escrivires/Z
escrofulosi/EVY
esdeven/Z
esdevindrem/Z
esdevingues/Z
esdrúixola/VY
esfilegàs/Z
esforcegat/BVY
esgarrifament/EVY
eslovè/HVY
Esmaragde/WY
esmoladora/VY
Esparreguera/VWY
esparverament/EVY
espatllejada/VY
espellús/Z
Espert/WY
espès/BJVY
espigam/EVY
Espinac/WY
Espinosa/WY
Esponda/WY
espontània/EVY
esporífer/FVY
Esquer/WY
esquitx/IVY
Esquiu/WY
estam/Z
Estanislau/WY
estatge/EVY
estatòrica/VY
estàvem/Z
Estefania/WY
Ester/WY
estiguérem/Z
estiguí/Z
estilisme/EVY
estimulant/EVY
Estivill/WY
Estrada/WY
estrafacis/Z
estrafèiem/Z
estrafessin/Z
estrambot/EVY
Estrella/WY
estrelleta/EVY
estupidesa/EVY
etèria/EVY
Eudòcia/WY
Eugènia/WY
euglenòfit/EVY
Eurípides/WY
Eutiques/WY
euxantina/EVY
Evelina/WY
excel·lida/VY
exegètica/VY
exogàmic/FVY
explicable/EVY
exprés/YZ
exterior/EVY
extravenada/VY
extreu/SZ
Exupèria/WY
haguem/Z
haguí/Z
hallstàttic/FVY
havem/Z
hectògraf/EVY
Hèctor/WY
helmint/EVY
hemostasi/EVY
Herbat/WY
Herbers/VWY
Heribert/WY
Hermògenes/WY
heterofonia/EVY
heus/Z
hexadecasíl·lab/EVY
Hidalgo/WY
higroma/EVY
higroscopicitat/EY
Hipaci/WY
hippy/EVY
holocènica/VY
homòmer/FVY
Honorina/WY
hortense/EVY
Hortensi/WY
Hortsoliu/WY
Huguet/WY
humeral/EVY
Ignasi/WY
Illa/VWY
il·latiu/BVY
imparcial/EVY
imposable/EVY
imprimesquis/Z
imprimires/Z
imprimísseu/Z
imputador/FVY
incongruent/EVY
inconscient/EVY
incorreguem/Z
incorreguí/Z
incorri/Z
Indaleci/WY
indisputable/EVY
inencongible/EVY
infernal/EVY
innomenable/EVY
inobjectable/EVY
inscrivira/Z
integratiu/BVY
interdeia/Z
interdigueren/Z
interdiguin/Z
interès/VYZ
interessant/EVY
intersexe/EVY
intervindrà/Z
intervinguérem/Z
intervinguí/Z
involucre/EVY
irèixer/CY
Isaac/WY
Isart/WY
isoprè/GVY
isquéreu/Z
ivorià/HVY
ix/Z
Obís/WY
obres/Z
obrírem/Z
obríssim/Z
obscur/FVY
obteniu/Z
obtinguem/Z
obtinguéssiu/Z
obveniu/Z
obvinguem/Z
obvinguéssiu/Z
ocasionadora/VY
ocorreguéssem/Z
ocorrerem/Z
ocorris/Z
octosa/EVY
oferina/EVY
oleica/VY
Olesa/VWY
Oliver/WY
olivet/EVY
Omeda/WY
omissió/GVY
omplíeu/Z
omplirien/Z
opció/GVY
opistòton/EVY
ordén/Z
ordissatge/EVY
Orell/WY
organdís/Y
Orlandis/WY
orquestra/EVY
Orteig/WY
Osmund/WY
ossuda/VY
ostaga/EVY
oxígens/Y
oxirinca/VY
preconceben/Z
revenç/Z
Ubals/WY
umbràtic/FVY
unilobulat/BVY
Urbà/WY
uroscòpia/EY
us/YZ
Usina/WY
